Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.150

Division of homestead.

If, from the report, it appears to the court that the value of the homestead, less liens and encumbrances senior to the judgment being executed upon and not including the judgment being executed upon, exceeds the homestead exemption and the property can be divided without material injury and without violation of any governmental restriction, the court may, by an order, direct the appraiser to set off to the owner so much of the land, including the residence, as will amount in net value to the homestead exemption, and the execution may be enforced against the remainder of the land.

[ 1999 c 403 s 2; 1987 c 442 s 215; 1981 c 329 s 17; 1895 c 64 s 17; RRS s 545. Formerly RCW 6.12.220.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 329: See note following RCW 6.21.020.